Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Revocation of Certificate of Authority

§ 17-19-1530.
Grounds for revocation.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under W.S.

17-19-1531

to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if any of the following has occurred:

The foreign corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for thirty (30) days or more;

The foreign corporation does not inform the secretary of state under W.S.

17-28-102

or

17-28-103

that its registered agent or registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued within thirty (30) days of the change, resignation or discontinuance;

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the foreign corporation signed a document the person knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

The secretary of state receives a duly authenticated certificate from the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger;

The corporation does not deliver its annual reports or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1630

;

The corporation has failed to respond to a valid and enforceable subpoena;

It is in the public interest and the corporation:

Has provided fraudulent information or has failed to correct false information upon request of the secretary of state on any filing with the secretary of state under this act; or

Cannot be served either by the registered agent or by mail or electronically by the secretary of state acting as the agent for process.

The foreign corporation has failed to pay any penalties imposed under W.S.

17-28-109

.

The attorney general may commence a proceeding under W.S.

17-19-1531

to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

The corporation would have been a public benefit corporation had it been incorporated in this state and that its corporate assets in this state are being misapplied or wasted; or

The corporation would have been a public benefit corporation had it been incorporated in this state and it is no longer able to carry out its purposes.

Prior to commencing a proceeding under W.S.

17-19-1531

the secretary of state may classify a foreign corporation as delinquent awaiting administrative revocation if the foreign corporation meets any of the criteria in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-102 or

17-28-103

” for “17-19-1508 or

17-19-1509

” in (a)(ii).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, in (a) by adding (a)(vi) and (a)(vii); adding (c); and making stylistic changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(intro), inserted “any of the following has occurred”; in (a)(vi), deleted “or”; and added (a)(viii).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(vii)(B), deleted "by" following "served", added "by" following "either" and "or electronically" following "mail."

§ 17-19-1531.
Procedure and effect of revocation.

The secretary of state upon determining that one (1) or more grounds exist under W.S.

17-19-1530

for revocation of a certificate of authority shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under W.S.

17-28-104

.

The attorney general upon determining that one (1) or more grounds exist under W.S. 17-19-1530(b) for revocation of a certificate of authority shall request the secretary of state to serve, and the secretary of state shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under W.S.

17-28-104

.

If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state or attorney general that each ground for revocation determined by the secretary of state or attorney general does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

, the secretary of state may revoke the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The secretary of state’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the secretary of state the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action that arose during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the secretary of state under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall either:

Mail a copy of the process to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or in any subsequent communications received from the corporation stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for a certificate of authority; or

Electronically submit a copy of the process to the foreign corporation’s email address.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-19-1510” throughout the section.

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by deleting “except for revocation pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1530(a)(v) in which case notice of the proposed revocation shall be given only as provided in subsection (g) of this section” at the end of (a); deleting the former last sentence of (c) which read: “The provisions of subsection (g) of this section shall govern the procedures for revocation pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1530(a)(v)”; repealing former (g) which related to notice of revocation of foreign corporation's certificate of authority.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated former (e) as (e) and (e)(i); added "either" at the end of (e); added "or" at the end of (e)(i); added (e)(ii); and made related changes.

§ 17-19-1532.
Appeal from revocation.

A foreign corporation may appeal the secretary of state’s revocation of its certificate of authority pursuant to W.S.

16-3-114

within thirty (30) days after the service of the certificate of revocation is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of its certificate of authority and the secretary of state’s certificate of revocation.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-19-1510”
in (a).

17-19-1533.
Reinstatement following revocation.

A foreign corporation whose certificate of authority has been revoked under W.S.

17-19-1531

may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement within two (2) years after the effective date of the revocation. Reinstatement may be denied by the secretary of state if the corporation has been the subject of a secretary of state and law enforcement investigation pertaining to fraud or any other violation of state or federal law, or if there is other reason to believe the foreign corporation has engaged in illegal operations. The application shall:

Recite the name of the foreign corporation and the effective date of the revocation of its certificate of authority;

State that the grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated;

If the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority was revoked for failure to deliver its annual report or pay annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1630

, include payment of a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) reinstatement fee and payment of any fees and taxes then delinquent; and

If the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority was revoked for failure to maintain a registered agent, include payment of a one hundred fifty dollar ($150.00) reinstatement fee and payment of any fees and taxes then delinquent.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, the secretary of state shall cancel the revocation, prepare a certificate of reinstatement reciting that determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation pursuant to W.S.

17-28-104

.

When reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the revocation and the foreign corporation may resume carrying on its activities as if the revocation had not occurred.

A foreign corporation may retain its registered corporate name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

History.

2021 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.